Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB567.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Employment Clarification Act.Section 2. Declaration of purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to overrule the common law construct known as at-will employment, created in whole cloth by the courts of this Commonwealth without legislative input.(2) The common law assumption of at-will employment presumes an unrealistic equality of bargaining power between employer and employee.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) This assumption was created to fill a vacuum in the laws of this Commonwealth.(4) The subsequent development of the legal and statutory concept of wrongful termination has implicitly nullified the assumption of termination without cause.(5) The resulting legal vacuum and uncertainty needs to be addressed by a legislative enactment specifying the proper assumptions of employment relationships.(6) It is in this Commonwealth's interest that employees, bargaining from a position of comparative disadvantage, should enjoy a greater presumption of employment protection as a matter of law.(7) It is in the interest of employers to provide certainty regarding the circumstances under which an employment relationship may be severed, thus preventing employers from being exposed to unexpected liability.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Breach of the duty of loyalty." As follows:(1) An employee's breach of the duty of loyalty due to the employee's employer in matters related to the employment relationship by any of the following:(i) Using or disclosing the employer's confidential information to serve an interest other than the employer's interest.(ii) Directly and meaningfully competing with the employer while employed by the employer.(iii) Appropriating the property of the employer or 20250HB0567PN0571 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 engaging in self-dealing through use of the employer's property.(2) The term does not include an employee's actions relating to the organization of a union or in furtherance of organizing other employees."Constructive discharge." The termination of employment by an employee due to a situation created by an act or omission of the employer that a reasonable person would find so intolerable that resignation is the only reasonable option. The term does not include termination due to an employer's refusal to promote the employee or improve wages, responsibilities or other terms and conditions of employment."Discharge." The termination of employment, including resignation, elimination of position, layoff, failure to recall or rehire or any other cutback in the number of employees."Employee." An individual employed by an employer, other than a temporary or seasonal employee hired for a specific period of not more than six months, an independent contractor or an individual in a business relationship not deemed an employment relationship under the laws of this Commonwealth."Employer." An individual, partnership, association, corporation, governmental body or other entity operating within this Commonwealth that provides employment to no less than 15 employees."Fringe benefits." The value of an employer-paid vacation leave, sick leave, medical insurance plan, disability insurance plan, life insurance plan or pension benefit plan in force on the date of discharge."Good cause." Reasonable job-related grounds for an employee's dismissal based on any of the following:20250HB0567PN0571 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Gross incompetence or dereliction of duty, including a breach of the duty of loyalty.(2) Commission of felonious acts in the workplace.(3) Repeated or gross violations of terms of employment as stated in an employee handbook or similar notice.(4) Financial exigency.(5) Conviction of a crime for which the employee must serve a sentence in a correctional setting, whether job related or not.(6) Being otherwise indisposed in a way that would make continued performance of duties impossible."Leave of absence." An employee's absence from work for any reason other than an anticipated or scheduled absence, including sick leave, a holiday or vacation."Lost wages." The gross amount of wages that would have been reported to the Internal Revenue Service as gross income on Form W-2, including additional compensation deferred at the option of an employee."Public policy." A policy in effect at the time of the discharge concerning public health, safety or welfare as established by Federal or State law."Start date." Unless otherwise specified, the date when an employer is obligated to begin paying wages and benefits, or the date when a written contract offering employment is signed by the employee, whichever is earlier.Section 4. Assumption of employment relationship.Except as otherwise provided in a clear, written and signed employment contract, it shall be presumed that an employment relationship between an employer and an employee is based on a yearly employment contract prohibiting the employer from 20250HB0567PN0571 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 terminating employment without good cause.Section 5. Terms of yearly employment contract.(a) One-year term.--Except as otherwise provided in a clear, written and signed employment contract, employment under the assumption of a yearly employment contract under section 4 shall be for a term of one year from the start date of employment.(b) Automatic renewal.--On the date when the term of employment under subsection (a) ends, unless the employer provides written notice of the employer's intent to terminate employment and a written reason for the decision to not renew to the employee no less than 30 days before the end date, the employment relationship shall be automatically renewed for another one-year term.(c) Termination of employment.--(1) An employee may terminate an employment relationship under this section at any time with or without notice to the employer.(2) An employer may terminate employment in a yearly employment contract under this section before the term of employment ends for good cause.Section 6. Prohibition on waivers or limitations of employment protections.(a) Prohibition.--The provisions of section 5 shall be considered minimum standards of job security, and any terms in a written employment contract limiting or waiving the provisions of section 5 shall be invalid and unenforceable.(b) Modifications.--An employer and employee may modify an employment relationship under section 5 by entering into a written and signed employment contract agreed to by the employer and employee after the start date. Nothing in this act shall be 20250HB0567PN0571 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construed to prohibit an employer and employee from entering into a written employment contract after the commencement of an employment relationship under section 5.Section 7. Elements of wrongful discharge.An employer engages in the wrongful discharge of an employee if any of the following apply:(1) The discharge was in retaliation for the employee's refusal to violate public policy or for reporting a violation of public policy.(2) The discharge was not for good cause.(3) The employer materially violated an express provision of the employer's written personnel policy before the discharge, and the violation deprived the employee of a fair and reasonable opportunity to remain in a position of employment with the employer.(4) The discharge violates a term of the employment contract, including the provisions of section 5.(5) The employer's conduct resulted in the constructive discharge of the employee.Section 8. Remedies for wrongful discharge.(a) Remedies.--If an employer engages in the wrongful discharge of an employee under section 7, the employee may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for appropriate damages. The following shall apply:(1) The court may award the employee reasonable attorney fees and lost wages and fringe benefits for a period not to exceed four years from the date of discharge, as well as reasonable amounts expended by the employee in searching for, obtaining or relocating to new employment, together with interest on the lost wages and fringe benefits calculated by 20250HB0567PN0571 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applying any upward change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area for each year since the date of discharge.(2) The court shall deduct from the amount awarded to the employee for lost wages under paragraph (1) the employee's interim earnings derived from a new kind, nature or type of work, hire, contractor status or employment that did not exist at the time of discharge.(3) The court shall consider the monetary payments, compensation or benefits the employee received from the employer arising from or related to the wrongful discharge, including early retirement pay, and shall deduct that amount from the amount awarded for lost wages under paragraph (1).(4) The court may award punitive damages to the employee if it is established by clear and convincing evidence that the employer acted fraudulently, maliciously or with wanton disregard for the employment protections specified under this act or an employment contract in the employer's wrongful discharge of the employee.(b) Statute of limitations.--An action under subsection (a) must be brought no later than four years after the date of discharge.(c) Nonexclusive remedy.--(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, limit or restrict any other cause of action or remedy regarding the wrongful discharge of an employee by an employer as specified under Federal or State law.(2) An employee may prove, by a preponderance of the evidence in a court of competent jurisdiction, that an 20250HB0567PN0571 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employer's decision to not renew an employment contract with the employee is motivated by retaliation, discrimination or any other motive prohibited by Federal or State law for which a remedy exists. In assessing the employer's decision to not renew an employment contract with the employee, the court may regard the employer's reason for the decision under section 5(b) as pretextual if the evidence indicates that an unlawful motive was a proximate cause of the decision.Section 9. Probationary period of employment.A written and signed employment contract may establish a specific probationary employment period from the start date, which shall not exceed three months. The following shall apply to a probationary employment period:(1) The employer may discharge the employee by providing written notice to the employee no later than two days prior to the date of discharge. An employer that discharges an employee during a probationary employment period in accordance with this paragraph shall not be civilly liable in an action brought by the employee under section 8.(2) If the employee takes a leave of absence during the probationary employment period, the time of the leave of absence may not be considered a part of the probationary employment period unless the employer affirmatively elects to include the leave of absence as part of the probationary employment period.(3) No less than 14 days before the end date of the probationary employment period, the employer shall notify the employee whether the employer is electing to continue the employment relationship. If the employer either elects to continue the employment relationship or fails to provide the 20250HB0567PN0571 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notice required under this paragraph to the employee at least 14 days before the end date of the probationary employment period, the provisions of sections 4 and 5 shall apply on the end date of the probationary employment period. If the employer elects not to continue the employment relationship, the employment relationship shall terminate on the end date of the probationary employment period.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0567PN0571 - 9 - 123456789